Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska18-633
Construction; cost; deposit; mandamus.

When any viaduct or subway construction project has been agreed to or when the division of costs has been otherwise finally determined and when such proposal has been approved by a vote as provided in sections 18-617 to 18-636, the railroad company or companies affected shall within ten days' notice or demand deposit with the city treasurer or village treasurer the amount of its proportionate share. The district court is hereby given jurisdiction upon the application of the governing body of the city or village to compel such deposit by mandamus together with such penalties as may be found and deemed reasonable by the court.

Laws 1949, c. 28, § 15, p. 109;

Laws 2021, LB163, § 63.